test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kielas_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - kielâs: # 2B
    kielâs+N+Sg+Nom: kielâs
    kielâs+N+Sg+Gen: kiellâs
    kielâs+N+Sg+Acc: kiellâs
    kielâs+N+Sg+Ill: kielâsân      # kieˊlâsân
    kielâs+N+Sg+Loc: kielâsist     # kieˊlâsist
    kielâs+N+Sg+Com: kielâsáin     # kieˊlâsáin
    kielâs+N+Sg+Abe: kiellâsttáá
    kielâs+N+Ess: kielâsin        # [kieˊlâsin, kielâsin, kiellâsin]
    kielâs+N+Par: kielâsid        # [kieˊlâsid, kielâsid, kiellâsid]
    kielâs+N+Pl+Nom: kielâseh       # kieˊlâseh
    kielâs+N+Pl+Gen: kielâsij       # kieˊlâsij
    kielâs+N+Pl+Acc: kielâsijd      # kieˊlâsijd
    kielâs+N+Pl+Ill: kielâsáid      # kieˊlâsáid
    kielâs+N+Pl+Loc: kielâsijn      # kieˊlâsijn
    kielâs+N+Pl+Com: kielâsijguin   # kieˊlâsijguin
    kielâs+N+Pl+Abe: kiellâsijttáá   # kielˊlâsijttáá
